Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.120

Commission—Officers.

Each commission shall elect its chair and vice chair from among the appointed members. The commission shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4110; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.120. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 12.]